Utah statutes.
17-36-8.   Preparation of budgets.

The budget officer of each county shall prepare each budget period, on forms provided pursuant to Section 17-36-4, a budget for each of the following funds which are included in its system of accounts:

(1)  general fund;

(2)  special revenue funds;

(3)  debt service funds;

(4)  capital project funds; and

(5)  any other fund or funds for which a budget is required by the uniform system of budgeting, accounting, and reporting.



Amended by Chapter 300, 1999 General Session

